Maryland, session 2025, SB0764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–313 through 7–319 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–314 through 7–320, respectively.
SECTION 1. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
OF MARYLAND, That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions

SENATE BILL 764 3
7–313.
THE ORIGINAL MARYLAND ORANGE CRUSH IS THE STATE COCKTAIL.
7–326.
CHROMITE IS THE STATE MINERAL.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.